Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVI Statutory Actions and Limitations
Hazardous Materials

411.450.
Definitions for KRS 411.460 and 411.470.

As used in KRS

411.460

and

411.470

unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Discharge or disposal” means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking or placing of any hazardous materials into or on any land or water so that such materials or any constituent thereof may enter the environment or be discharged into any waters, including ground waters.

“Hazardous material” means a substance or material in a quantity and form which may pose an unreasonable risk to health and safety or property when transported and which has been designated as a hazardous material under the Federal Hazardous Materials Transportation Law (49

U.S.C. sec. 5101

et seq.) or by any state law or regulation.

“Person” means any individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, corporation (including a government corporation), partnership, association, federal agency, state agency, city, commission, political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or any interstate body.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 337, § 1, effective April 9, 1984; 2005, ch. 165, § 11, effective June 20, 2005.

411.460.
Person who assists or advises in effort to mitigate effects of hazardous waste disposal or discharge immune from civil or criminal liability.

No person who provides assistance or advice in mitigating or attempting to mitigate the effects of an actual or threatened discharge or disposal of hazardous materials, or in preventing, cleaning up, or disposing of or in attempting to prevent, clean up or dispose of any such discharge, shall be subject to any civil or criminal liabilities or penalties. This immunity shall not apply to any person whose act or omission caused in whole or in part the actual or threatened discharge or disposal and who would otherwise be liable for the discharge or disposal. Also this immunity shall not apply to any person who provides assistance or advice for remuneration or with the expectation of remuneration, except that actual expenses directly incurred due to giving the assistance or advice may be recovered without losing the immunity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 337, § 2, effective April 9, 1984.

411.470.
Immunity does not extend to gross negligence or reckless, wanton or intentional misconduct.

Nothing in KRS

411.460

shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the liability of any person for damages resulting from such person’s gross negligence, or reckless, wanton, or intentional misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 337, § 3, effective April 9, 1984.